Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 4

Tennessee Cosmetology Act of 1986

62-4-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Cosmetology Act of 1986.”

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Cross-References. Electrologists, title 63, ch. 26.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

62-4-102. Chapter definitions — Exceptions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Aesthetics” means any of the following practices:

Massaging, cleansing, stimulating, manipulating, exercising, beautifying or similar work with hands or mechanical or electrical apparatus or by the use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions or creams;

Placing or applying artificial eyelashes; or

Giving facials, applying makeup, giving skin care or removing superfluous hair by tweezing, depilatories or waxing;

“Board” means the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners created by § 62-4-103;

“Cosmetology” means any of the following practices:

Arranging, dressing, curling, waving, cleansing, cutting, singeing, bleaching, coloring or similar work on the hair of any person by any means;

Caring and servicing of wigs and hair pieces;

Manicuring;

Massaging, cleansing, stimulating, manipulating, exercising, beautifying or similar work upon the hands, arms, face, neck or feet with hands or by the use of cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions or creams;

Placing or applying artificial eyelashes;

Giving facials, applying makeup, giving skin care or removing superfluous hair by tweezing, depilatories or waxing;

Providing a necessary service that is preparatory or ancillary to a service pursuant to this subdivision (a)(3);

Treating a person's mustache or beard by arranging, beautifying, coloring, processing, styling, trimming, or shaving with a safety razor;

Shampooing; or

Natural hair styling;

“Cosmetology shop” means any place of business where any person engages or offers to engage in any practice of cosmetology for a fee or other form of compensation, but does not include a manicure shop, skin care shop, or natural hair styling shop;

“Designated manager” means a person licensed under chapter 3 or chapter 4 of this title in at least one (1) discipline that a shop is licensed to offer, and who serves in a supervisory or managerial capacity of the shop in the absence of the manager;

“Dual shop” means any shop licensed by the board where services are performed or offered to be performed in more than one (1) field of cosmetology, including aesthetics, natural hair styling, and manicuring, or in both cosmetology, or a field of cosmetology, and barbering. A dual shop does not include a shop licensed solely as a cosmetology shop or a single specialty thereof, or as a barber shop;

“Hair braiding” means techniques that result in tension on hair strands, such as twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding of the hair, by hand or mechanical appliances for compensation, without cutting, coloring, relaxing, removing, chemically treating, or using other preparations to straighten, curl, or alter the structure of the hair;

“Hair wrapping” means the wrapping of manufactured materials around a strand or strands of human hair for compensation, without cutting, coloring, permanent waving, relaxing, removing, weaving, chemically treating, braiding, using hair extensions or performing any other service otherwise covered by this chapter;

“Instructor trainee” means any person who holds a valid cosmetologist's, manicurist's, aesthetician's or natural hair stylist's license issued by the board who is engaged in a board-approved course in instructor training of at least three hundred (300) hours to be completed within a period of six (6) months, which course includes practice teaching in a school under the personal supervision of a licensed instructor;

“Junior instructor” means any person who holds a valid cosmetologist's, manicurist's, aesthetician's or natural hair stylist's license issued by the board who is engaged in a course of training in practice teaching in a school under the personal supervision of a licensed instructor for a period of time not to exceed three (3) years;

“Manager” means a person licensed under chapter 3 or chapter 4 of this title in at least one (1) discipline that a shop is licensed to offer, who serves in a supervisory or managerial capacity in the shop, and whose information is filed with the board;

“Managing aesthetician” means a person licensed to practice aesthetics who is designated by the owner of a skin care shop to be responsible for supervising the operation of the shop and its employees;

“Managing cosmetologist” means a licensed cosmetologist who is designated by the owner of a cosmetology shop to be responsible for supervising the operation of the shop and its employees;

“Managing manicurist” means a person licensed to practice manicuring who is designated by the owner of a manicure shop to be responsible for supervising the operation of the shop and its employees;

“Manicure shop” means any place of business where any person performs or offers to perform only manicuring services for a fee or other form of compensation;

“Manicuring” means manicuring or pedicuring the nails of any person or performing nail artistry;

“Mobile shop” means any self-contained, self-supporting, enclosed motor vehicle that may be used as a barber shop, cosmetology shop, dual shop, manicure shop, skin care shop, or any other category of shop licensed by the board;

“Natural hair styling” means techniques that result in tension on hair strands such as twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking or braiding of the hair by hand or mechanical appliances, which work does not include the application of dyes, reactive chemicals or other preparations to alter the color or to straighten, curl or alter the structure of the hair. The techniques include providing or offering to the general public for compensation any of the following services solely for development or improvement of physical qualities of the natural hair structure:

Intertwining in a systematic motion to create patterns in a three-dimensional form;

Inversion or outversion flat against the scalp along the part of a straight or curved row; or

Extension with natural or synthetic fibers;

“Natural hair styling shop” means a place of business where a person licensed pursuant to this chapter performs or offers to perform only natural hair styling for a fee or other form of compensation;

“Natural hair stylist” means a person licensed to practice natural hair styling;

“Safety razor” means a razor that is fitted with a guard close to the cutting edge of the razor that is intended to:

Prevent the razor from cutting too deeply; and

Reduce the risk and incidence of accidental cuts;

“School” means a school of cosmetology;

“Shampooing” means any brushing, combing, shampooing, rinsing or conditioning upon the hair and scalp;

“Shop” means a cosmetology shop, manicure shop, skin care shop, or natural hair styling shop;

“Skin care shop” means any place of business where any person performs or offers to perform exclusively aesthetics services for a fee or other form of compensation; and

“Student” means any person who is engaged in learning, performing or assisting in any of the practices of cosmetology under the immediate supervision of an instructor of cosmetology; however, for the purposes of this chapter, neither instructor trainees nor junior instructors shall be considered as students.

The practice of aesthetics or the practice of cosmetology does not include any treatment or attempt to treat any abnormality or disease-related condition of the skin, skin disease process or aging process of the skin.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 3; 1987, ch. 112, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 902, § 1; 1989, ch. 93, §§ 1-3; 1996, ch. 897, §§ 1, 2, 19; 2002, ch. 804, § 1; 2007, ch. 485, §§ 1, 2; 2014, ch. 964, § 6; 2015, ch. 402, §§ 13, 14; 2016, ch. 838, §§ 5, 6; 2016, ch. 991, §§ 6, 8-10; 2016, ch. 983, § 3; 2019, ch. 207, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added the definition of “hair braiding” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 207, § 4. July 1, 2019; provided that, for the purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect April 25, 2019.

Cross-References. Massage registration, title 63, ch. 18.

Law Reviews.

Do Your Job: Judicial Review of Occupational Licensing in the Face of Economic Protectionism, 70 Vand. L. Rev. 1663 (2017).

Attorney General Opinions. This Office is not aware of any Tennessee law prohibiting eyelash tinting. Eyelash tinting is governed by the Board of Cosmetology because it is the coloring of hair. OAG 11-51, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (6/22/11).

62-4-103. Board of cosmetology and barber examiners.

The practices of cosmetology and barbering shall be under the supervision of a board known as the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners.

The board shall consist of fourteen (14) members, to be appointed by the governor.

The membership of the board shall include the following persons:

Three (3) cosmetologists;

Two (2) master barbers;

One (1) manicurist;

One (1) aesthetician;

One (1) natural hair stylist;

One (1) cosmetology or barber instructor;

One (1) cosmetology or barber shop owner;

One (1) member shall be an owner of a cosmetology school licensed by the board;

One (1) member shall be an owner of a barber school licensed by the board;

One (1) public member, who shall be a person who holds a baccalaureate degree with a major in education who is not engaged in the occupation of cosmetology or barbering; and

One (1) public member who shall be a person at least twenty-one (21) years of age, who is not required to meet the educational degree requirements as the public member listed in subdivision (b)(2)(J), and who is not engaged in the occupation of cosmetology or barbering.

One (1) of the members appointed in accordance with subdivisions (b)(2)(F) and (G) shall represent the cosmetology profession and one (1) shall represent the barber profession, however at no time shall both members represent the same profession.

Each of the members described in subdivisions (b)(2)(A)-(I) shall be licensed in their respective trade in this state for at least five (5) years immediately preceding their date of appointment.

No cosmetologist member or master barber member shall, while serving on the board, be an instructor, owner or manager of a school of cosmetology, barber school or college of barbering, an employee in such a school, or in any manner connected with such a school.

The public member listed in subdivision (b)(2)(J) shall participate in all activities of the board except the inspection of schools of cosmetology, barber schools, and colleges of barbering.

The public member listed in subdivision (b)(2)(K) shall participate in all activities of the board except the composition of examinations, administration of practical portions of examinations, and inspection of schools of cosmetology, barber schools, and colleges of barbering.

The owners of schools licensed by the board or the instructors licensed by the board shall be entitled to participate in all activities of the board, except administration of examinations and inspection of schools of cosmetology, barber schools or colleges of barbering.

No more than five (5) members shall be appointed from the same grand division.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 3; 1988, ch. 902, §§ 18, 19; 1988, ch. 1013, § 28; 2014, ch. 964, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. The state board of cosmetology and barber examiners, created by this section and § 62-3-101, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Acts 2014, ch. 964, § 14 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the board of cosmetology and the board of barber examiners shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon July 1, 2014, simultaneous with the establishment of the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners, created by §§ 62-3-101 and 62-4-103.

Acts 2014, ch. 964, § 15 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the rules of the board of cosmetology and the rules of the board of barber examiners shall be deemed to be the rules of the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners created by the act, and to the extent that such rules conflict the board shall promulgate new rules to make the application thereof applicable to the respective professions.

Acts 2014, ch. 964, § 16 provided that all records and reports of the respective boards in existence prior to July 1, 2014, shall be transferred to the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners.

The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance for purposes of administration. See §§ 4-3-1304, 56-1-301 — 56-1-306.

Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2016, ch. 561, 3 provides that the division of state audit shall return to the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners in 2017 for the purpose of conducting a question and answer review of the board. The division of state audit shall complete the question and answer review within a period sufficient to allow for its timely review by the government operations joint subcommittee on commerce, labor, transportation, and agriculture.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

62-4-104. Terms of board members — Oath — Removal.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the terms of the members of the board shall be four (4) years.

The entire membership of the board as comprised on June 30, 2014, shall be vacated on July 1, 2014, and new members shall be appointed in accordance with § 62-4-103.

In order to stagger the terms of the newly appointed board members, the governor shall make initial appointments as follows:

Three (3) persons shall be appointed for terms of one (1) year, which shall expire on June 30, 2015;

Three (3) persons shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years, which shall expire on June 30, 2016;

Four (4) persons shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years, which shall expire on June 30, 2017; and

Four (4) persons shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years, which shall expire on June 30, 2018.

Of the members initially appointed:

The cosmetology school owner member, the manicurist member and the public member listed in § 62-4-103(b)(2)(K) shall serve terms of one (1) year;

One (1) cosmetologist member, one (1) master barber member and the barber school owner member shall serve terms of two (2) years;

One (1) cosmetologist member, one (1) master barber member, the cosmetology or barber shop owner member, and the cosmetology or barber instructor member shall serve terms of three (3) years; and

The aesthetician member, the natural hair stylist member, one (1) cosmetologist member, and the public member listed in § 62-4-103(b)(2)(J) shall serve terms of four (4) years.

Following the expiration of members' initial terms as prescribed in subdivision (b)(2), all four-year terms shall begin on July 1 and terminate on June 30, four (4) years thereafter.

All members shall serve until the expiration of the term to which they were appointed and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

Members shall be eligible for reappointment to the board following the expiration of their terms but shall serve no more than two (2) consecutive four-year terms.

A vacancy occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment but for the unexpired term only.

The governor may remove any member of the board for misconduct, incompetency, willful neglect of duty, or other just cause.

Any member who is absent from more than two (2) board meetings within a one-year period shall be removed from the board and a new member shall be appointed to fill the remainder of the unexpired term.

Prior to beginning their duties, each member of the board shall take and subscribe to the oath of office provided for state officers.

Each member shall have been a bona fide resident of this state for a period of at least five (5) years immediately preceding the date of appointment.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 4; 1988, ch. 902, § 20; 2014, ch. 964, § 5; 2015, ch. 402, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

62-4-105. Board officers, duties and rules.

The board shall annually elect from its members a chair and vice chair.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any board meeting.

The director of the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance or the director's designee shall serve as secretary of the board and shall perform all administrative functions for the board.

The duties of the board shall be to conduct or cause to be conducted examinations of applicants and to make and declare the policy of the board.

The board is authorized to promulgate rules that are reasonably necessary to effectuate this chapter. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Attorney General Opinions. The board of cosmetology has the authority to terminate a contract between the board and a contractor who performs testing of applicants for licensure, OAG 02-122, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 127 (11/4/02).

62-4-106. Receipts and disbursements by board.

All fees and moneys from whatever source coming into the hands of the board shall be paid by the board to the state treasurer and become a part of the general fund.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall make allotments out of the general fund for the proper expenditures of the board. No expenditure shall be made by the board until allotment for the expenditure has been made by the commissioner. Allotments for the operation of the board shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Former § 62-4-106 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, § 5; 1949, ch. 179, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 7139.5 (Williams, § 7139.20); Acts 1951, ch. 227, § 1-a; 1959, ch. 298, § 5; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(102); 1979, ch. 380, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-406; Acts 1982, ch. 633, § 2), concerning compensation of board members, was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 676, § 14.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

62-4-107. Record of board proceedings — Publication of laws and rules.

The board shall keep a record of its proceedings. The record shall be prima facie evidence of matters contained in the records and shall at all reasonable times be open for public inspection.

The board shall publish a compilation of its laws, rules, and any amendments or other changes to the laws and rules on its website within ten (10) days of any effective date.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 7; 2014, ch. 964, § 8; 2015, ch. 402, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Acts 2014, ch. 964, § 15 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the rules of the board of cosmetology and the rules of the board of barber examiners shall be deemed to be the rules of the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners created by the act, and to the extent that such rules conflict the board shall promulgate new rules to make the application thereof applicable to the respective professions.

Acts 2014, ch. 964, § 16 provided that all records and reports of the respective boards in existence prior to July 1, 2014, shall be transferred to the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners.

Acts 2015, ch. 402, § 34 provided that the board of cosmetology and barber examiners is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. The rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Open records law, title 10, ch. 7.

62-4-108. License required to practice or teach.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall practice, teach or attempt to practice or teach, cosmetology, manicuring, aesthetics, or natural hair styling in this state without a valid license issued by the board pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 8; 1989, ch. 93, § 4; 1996, ch. 897, § 3; 2016, ch. 991, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

62-4-109. Persons and activities exempt.

The following persons are exempt from this chapter:

Persons and establishments engaged exclusively in massage, as defined by § 63-18-102;

Duly registered barbers and technicians operating in duly registered barber shops only;

Physicians and surgeons or trained nurses, trained nurses assistants, aides or similar personnel, acting solely in their professional capacities;

Any person rendering cosmetology services in the person's own home without charge to the recipient;

Any person who demonstrates or applies, or both, cosmetics without charge in a retail establishment;

Any person who engages in hair wrapping; provided, that the person posts a notice at the place of business indicating that the person is not licensed by the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners; and provided, further, that the person uses disposable instruments or implements that are sanitized in a disinfectant approved for hospital use or approved by the federal environmental protection agency. Before engaging in hair wrapping, a person shall attend sixteen (16) hours of training provided by a licensed school of cosmetology and shall receive a certificate indicating attendance at the training. The certificate shall be retained and displayed on request. The training shall consist of eight (8) hours concerning health and hygiene issues and eight (8) hours concerning relevant state law;

Any person whose occupation or practice is confined solely to shampooing; and

Any person who engages in hair braiding if the person complies with § 62-4-135.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to the educational activities conducted in connection with any special education program of any bona fide association of licensed cosmetologists from which the general public is excluded.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 9; 1987, ch. 112, § 3; 1987, ch. 382, § 29; 1988, ch. 902, § 15; 1989, ch. 93, § 5; 2002, ch. 804, § 2; 2014, ch. 964, § 6; 2017, ch. 227, § 2; 2019, ch. 207, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 (Acts 1939, ch. 29, §§ 1-8, 10-12, 17, 18; 1949, ch. 179, §§ 1, 2, 4-7, 9, 15; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 7139.1-7139.8, 7139.10-7139.12, 7139.16, 7139.17, 7139.21 (Williams, §§ 7139.16-7139.23, 7139.25-7139.27, 7139.29, 7139.33, 7139.39); Acts 1951, ch. 227, §§ 1-3, 6; 1959, ch. 298, §§ 1-4, 7, 8, 10, 11, 17; 1965, ch. 199, §§ 1, 3, 4, 14; 1972, ch. 603, § 1; 1972, ch. 808, §§ 1-3; 1973, ch. 367, § 1; 1975, ch. 104, §§ 3, 4; 1975, ch. 122, §§ 1-4, 7, 8; 1975, ch. 165, § 8; 1976, ch. 649, § 1; 1976, ch. 690, § 1; 1978, ch. 580, § 1; 1978, ch. 581, § 1; 1978, ch. 906, § 14; 1979, ch. 380, §§ 1, 3, 5; 1980, ch. 451, § 11; 1982, ch. 633, §§ 1, 3, 4-10, 12-23; 1984, ch. 521, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-401 — 62-405, 62-408 — 62-411, 62-413 — 62-417, 62-422, 62-423, 62-428, 62-431, 62-432), concerning cosmetology, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31.

Acts 1986, ch. 817, § 31 provided that the rules promulgated under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1986, shall remain in effect as rules under this chapter until amended or repealed by the board. Any such rules that may conflict with a provision of this chapter shall be invalid; however, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining rules. All licenses and certificates of registration issued under former §§ 62-4-101 — 62-4-127 prior to August 31, 1936, shall remain in effect until they expire or are revoked or modified pursuant to this chapter. This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before August 31, 1986.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (a)(8).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 207, § 4. July 1, 2019; provided that, for the purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect April 25, 2019.

Cross-References. Exemption from barber licensing law, § 62-3-108.

Exemption from licensing provisions as to healing arts, § 63-1-104.

Attorney General Opinions. Exemption from the Cosmetology Act for medical professionals. OAG 12-91, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 96 (9/25/12).

An aesthetician licensed by the Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners may not perform microblading and/or microneedling in a cosmetology shop or at a medical spa. A person not licensed by the Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners may perform microneedling only if that person satisfies an exemption found in T.C.A. § 62-4-109. A person not licensed by the Board of Cosmetology and Barber Examiners may perform microblading only if that person satisfies an exemption found in T.C.A. § 62-4-109 and either is a licensed tattoo artist under T.C.A. § 62-38-204 or is exempt from tattooing laws and regulations under T.C.A. § 62-38-210(b). The marks created by microblading constitute a tattoo. An individual may perform microblading only if that person satisfies an exemption found in Tenn. Code Ann. § 62-4-109 and is a licensed tattoo artist under Tenn. Code Ann. § 62-38-204 or is exempt from tattooing laws and regulations under Tenn. Code Ann. § 62-38-210(b). OAG 17-31, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 30 (4/20/2017).